Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1743
Building permit; duplicate; issued to county assessor; when.

Any city or village which requires that a building permit be issued for the erection, alteration, or repair of any building within its corporate limits or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction shall, if the improvement is two thousand five hundred dollars or more, issue a duplicate of such permit to the county assessor.

Laws 1979, LB 47, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 292, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 110.